Wyoming statutes. Title 30 Mines and Minerals
Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions relative to mines and minerals generally, see art. 9, Wyo. Const.

As to assessment of coal lands for taxation, see art. 15, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to taxation of mines and mining claims, see art. 15, § 3, Wyo. Const.

As to excise tax on minerals, see art. 15, § 19, Wyo. Const.

As to hours of labor in mines, see art. 19, § 2, Wyo. Const.

As to right of eminent domain with reference to ways of necessity for mining purposes, or for the transportation of coal, and as to the procedure in connection therewith, see Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P., and §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

As to sale, lease, etc., of mineral content of real property by fiduciaries, see §§

2-3-503

,

2-3-504

.

As to general duties and powers of state geologist, see §

9-2-803

.

As to geological survey, see §§

9-2-804

through

9-2-809

.

For authority of state loan and investment board as to sale or lease of land with reference to both mineral and surface rights, etc., see §

11-34-120

.

As to incorporation, etc., of ditch companies, see §

17-12-101

et seq.

For duty of county clerk to keep water users records as official records, see §

18-3-402

.

As to mineral leases of state experimental farmland, see §

21-17-307

.

As to reservation of mineral rights on migratory bird refuges maintained by United States, see §§

23-1-105

,

23-1-106

.

As to prohibition against allowing water to be dammed so as to permit overflow on public roads or highways, or undermine, weaken or damage any bridge, etc., in connection with mining operations, see §

24-1-116

.

For exemption of coal and metaliferous mines from statutes relating to inspection and application of safety devices, see §

27-1-104

.

As to working day in mines generally, see §

27-5-102

.

As to lien and enforcement by action in connection with mines and oil wells, see §§

29-3-101

through

29-3-111

.

For provision that no covenant shall be implied in any conveyance of real estate other than a conveyance of oil, gas or other minerals, see §

34-1-135

.

As to effect of failure of lessee of oil, gas or other mineral leases to record cancellation, expiration, etc., thereof in office of county clerk within 20 days after request, see §

34-2-130

.

As to prohibition against entering mines, mills or factories while intoxicated or taking intoxicants into mines, mills, etc., see §

35-10-402

.

As to granting of mineral rights with reference to lands exchanged between state and the United States, see §

36-1-105

.

As to mineral leases on public lands and disposition of proceeds, see §§

36-6-101

through

36-6-105

.

As to mineral leases of counties, cities, towns and school districts, see §§

36-6-201

through

36-6-204

.

As to reservation of mineral rights with reference to lands acquired by the United States, see §

36-10-101

.

As to assessment of mines and products thereof for taxation, see §§

39-14-101

through

39-14-711

.

As to use of water in connection with mines and mining under Colorado River Compact, see §

41-12-301

.

As to use of water under Upper Colorado River Basin Compact in connection with mining, see §

41-12-401

.

Revision of title. —

Chapter 11, Laws 1983, revised chapters 2, 3, 4, 6 and 7, generally amending, renumbering and repealing the provisions thereof. No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1983 act has been attempted, but, where appropriate, historical citations to former provisions have been added to corresponding sections in this title, and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections where it was felt that they would be helpful. For tables of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Section 4, ch. 11, Laws 1983, reads: “This act is effective July 1, 1983.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mining exemption to sales or use tax, 47 ALR4th 1229.

Liability for reclamation fees under § 402 of Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act (30 USC § 1232), 117 ALR Fed 377.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition § 33.05 (Matthew Bender).